en: sage
af: salie
ar: مريمية
bs: kadulja
ca: sàlvia
cs: šalvěj
cy: saets
da: salvie
de: Salbei
el: φασκόμηλο
es: salvia
et: salvei
fa: مریم‌گلی
fi: salvia
fr: sauge
ga: sáiste
he: מרווה
hr: kadulja, kadulje
hu: zsálya
id: salvio
it: salvia
ja: セージ
kk: шалфей
ko: 세이지
la: salvia officinalis
lt: šalavija
lv: salvija
mk: жалфија
nb: salvie
nl: salie
os: мыдгæрдæг
pl: szałwia, szałwii
ps: مريم گلي
qu: q'uwa
ro: salvie
ru: шалфей
sh: kadulja
sk: šalvia
sl: žajbelj
sr: жалфија
sv: salvia
tr: ada çayı
uk: шавлія
ur: مریم گلی
vi: xô thơm
zh: 鼠尾草

en: fresh sage
fr: sauge fraîche

en: dried sage
fr: sauge séchée

en: sage oil
de: salbeiöl
es: aceite de salvia
hr: ulje kadulje
it: olio di salvia
sl: žajbljevo olje

en: tulsi
de: Indisches Basilikum (Tulsi), Tulsi
fr: tulsi
hr: tulsi
it: tulsi (basilico sacro)

en: raspberry leaf, raspberry Leaves
fr: feuilles de framboisier
hr: list maline
it: foglia di lampone
nl: frambozenblad, frambozenbladeren

en: lovage
af: Lavas
ar: كاشم رومي
az: Dərman levistiki
be: Любіста
bg: девесил
ca: api bord
cs: libeček lékařský
cy: Llwfach
da: Løvstikke
de: Liebstöckel
el: Λεβιστικόν το φαρμακευτικόν
eo: Levistiko
es: levistico
et: Harilik leeskputk
fa: انجدان رومی
fi: liperi, lipstikka, lippstikka
fr: livèche
ga: Luáiste
he: לאושטיאן
hr: ljupčac
hu: orvosi lestyán
is: Skessujurt
it: sedano di montagna
ja: ラベージ
kk: Сүйментамыр
la: Levisticum officinale
lt: Vaistinė gelsvė
lv: Ārstniecības lupstājs
nb: Løpstikke
nl: lavas
oc: Api salvatge
pl: lubczyk, lubczyku, lubczyka
pt: Levístico
ro: Leuștean
ru: Любисток
sk: Ligurček lekársky
sl: Luštrek
sr: Selen
sv: Libbsticka
uk: Любисток лікарський
zh: 欧当归

en: lovage leaves
de: Liebstöckel Blätter, Liebstöckelblätter
fi: liperin lehdet
fr: feuilles de livèche
hr: ljupčac list
it: foglie di levistico
pl: liście lubczyku, lubczyk liść

en: dried lovage
de: Getrockneter Liebstöckel
fi: kuivattu liperi
fr: livèche séchée
hr: osušeni ljupčac
it: levistico essiccato
pl: lubczyk suszony, suszony lubczyk

en: lovage root
da: løvstikkerod
de: liebstöckelwurzel
fi: lipstikanjuuri
fr: racine de livèche
hr: ljupčac korijen
it: radice di levistico
nl: lavaswortel
pl: korzeń lubczyku, korzeń lubczyka
sv: libbstickarot

en: cornflower
ar: قنطريون عنبري
az: Əkin güləvəri
ba: Зәңгәр сәскә
be: Васілёк сіні
bg: синя метличина
ca: blavet
cs: chrpa polní
cy: Glas yr ŷd
da: kornblomst
de: Kornblume, Kornblumen
eo: Cejano
es: aciano
et: Rukkilill
eu: Nabar-lore
fa: گل گندم
fi: Ruiskaunokki
fr: bleuet des champs
ga: Gormán
gv: Blaa arroo
he: דרדר כחול
hr: različak
hu: Búzavirág
hy: տերեփուկ կապույտ
io: Aciano
is: Garðakornblóm
it: fiordaliso
ja: ヤグルマギク
kk: Көк гүлкекіре
ko: 수레국화
la: Centaurea cyanus
lb: Karblumm
lt: Rugiagėlė
lv: rudzupuķe
nb: kornblom
nl: korenbloem
nn: kornblom
os: Æрвдидинæг
pl: chaber bławatek
ro: Albăstrea
ru: Василёк синий
sk: nevädza poľná
sl: Modri glavinec
sq: Kokoçeli ngjyrë qielli
sv: blåklint
tg: Чашми гӯсола
th: คอร์นฟลาวเวอร์
tr: Mavi kantaron
uk: Волошка синя
zh: 矢車菊

en: marigold
bs: Neven
ca: boixac de jardí
cs: měsíček lékařský
cy: Melyn Mair
da: Have-Morgenfrue
de: Ringelblume, Ringelblumen
el: Καλέντουλα η φαρμακευτική
eo: Kalendulo
es: calendula, caléndula
et: Harilik saialill
eu: Ilen kultibatu
fa: گل همیشه‌بهار
fi: kehäkukka, tarhakehäkukka
fr: souci, soucis, fleurs de calendula, calendula
ga: Ór Muire
gl: Maravalla
hr: neven, Calendula officinalis L.
hu: Orvosi körömvirág
is: Morgunfrú
it: calendula
ja: キンセンカ
kn: ಕ್ಯಾಲೆಂಡುಲ ಅಫಿಷಿನಾಲಿಸ್
ky: Теңгегүлү
la: Calendula officinalis
lt: Vaistinė medetka
lv: Kliņģerīte
mk: невен
nb: Ringblom
nl: Goudsbloem
nn: Ringblom
pl: Nagietek lekarski
qu: Uchuq'aspa
ro: Gălbenele
ru: Ноготки лекарственные
rw: Susi
sh: Neven
sk: nechtík lekársky
sl: Vrtni ognjič
sq: Kalendula mjekësore
sr: невен
sv: Ringblomma
uk: Нагідки лікарські
ur: گل اشرفی
zh: 金盞花

en: sweet woodruff, woodruff
de: Waldmeister
fr: aspérule odorante, gaillet odorant
hr: slatka šumarica
it: asperula odorosa
la: galium odoratum, asperula odorata
nl: lievevrouwebedstro

en: marjoram
af: marjolein
az: mərzə
be: маяран
bg: майорана
bs: mažuran
ca: marduix
cs: majoránka
cy: penrhudd yr ardd
da: merian
de: Majoran
el: ματζουράνα
eo: majorano
es: mejorana
et: majoraan
eu: mendaro
fa: مرزنجوش
fi: meirami
fr: marjolaine
ga: oragán cumhra
gl: maiorana
he: מיורן
hi: मरुआ
hr: majoran, origanum majorana, mažuran, divlji mažuran
hu: majoránna
id: marjoram
io: majorano
it: maggiorana
ja: マジョラム
kk: майоран
kn: ಮರುಗ
ko: 마저럼
ky: майоран
la: amaracum
li: majoraan
lt: mairūnas
lv: majorāns
mk: мајоран
ms: marjoram
mt: merqtux
nb: merian
nl: marjolein, majoraan
nn: merian
oc: majorana
pa: ਮਰੂਆ
pl: majeranek, majeranku
pt: manjerona
qu: mikhurana
ro: maghiran
ru: майоран
sk: majoránka
sr: mažuran
sv: mejram
te: మరువము
tr: mercanköşk
uk: майоран
wa: mariolinne
zh: 墨角蘭

en: dried marjoram
fr: Marjolaine séchée
it: maggiorana essiccata

en: herbes de Provence
ca: herbes de Provença, herbes provençals
da: herbes de Provence
de: Provence-Kräuter, Kräuter der Provence
es: Hierbas de Provenza, hierbas provenzales
fi: herbes de provence
fr: herbes de provence, herbe de provence
hr: herbes de provence
it: erbe di Provenza
nl: provençaalse kruiden
pl: zioła prowansalskie
pt: plante aromatice de Provence
sv: provensalska örter

en: oregano
xx: oregano
bg: риган
ca: orenga, herba musca, roca morera
cs: oregano
da: oregano
de: oregano, Origano
el: ρίξανη
es: orégano
et: pune, oregaano
fi: oregano
fr: origan
hr: origana, origano, oregano
hu: oregánó, szurokfű
it: origano
ja: オレガノ
lt: raudonėlis, raudonėlių
lv: raudene
nl: oregano
pl: oregano
pt: orégãos
ru: орегано
sl: origano
uk: орегано

en: dried oregano
fi: kuivattu oregano
fr: Origan séché, origan déshydraté
hr: sušeni origano
it: origano essiccato
pl: suszone oregano

en: Yomogi, Japanese magwort, Korean wormwood, Korean mugwort
it: yomogi
ja: ヨモギ, よもぎ, 蓬, 艾, モチグサ, もちぐさ, 餅草

en: bay leaf, bay leaves, bay, laurel, bayleaf
af: lourierblaar
be: лаўровы ліст
bg: дафинов лист
ca: llorer
cs: bobkový list
da: laurbær, laurbærblade
de: lorbeer, lorbeerblatt, lorbeerblätter
es: hoja de laurel, laurel
fi: laakerinlehti
fr: feuille de laurier, laurier
hi: तेज पत्ता
hr: lovor, lovorov
hu: babérlevél
hy: դափնու տերև
it: laurier, alloro, lauro
jv: ローリエ
kk: лавр жапырағы
ko: 월계수 잎
la: laurus nobilis
mr: तमालपत्र
ms: daun salam
my: ကရဝေးပင်
nl: laurierblad, laurier
or: ତେଜପତ୍ର
pl: liść laurowy, liście laurowe, liści laurowych
pt: louro, folha de louro, folhas de louro
ro: foi de dafin, dafin
ru: лавровый лист, лист лавровый
sk: bobkový list
sv: lagerblad
te: మాసాల ఆకు
tg: барги ғор
th: ใบกระวาน
tl: bay leaf
tr: akdeniz defnesi
uk: лавровий лист
uz: dafna yaprogʻi
zh: 月桂葉